scrapedcsv2yaml/yaml_output/VII_VV.yaml
     adikokaa+VII+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Sg: adikokaa
     adikokaa+VII+Cnj+Pos+Neu+0Sg: adikokaag
     aditebagaa+VII+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Sg: aditebagaa
     aditebagaa+VII+Cnj+Pos+Neu+0Sg: aditebagaag
     adoopiikaa+VII+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Sg: adoopiikaa
     agawaateshkaa+VII+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Sg: agawaateshkaa
     agawaateshkaa+VII+Cnj+Pos+Neu+0Sg: agawaateshkaag
     agawaateshkaa+VII+?+Pos+Neu+0Sg: egawaateshkaag
     agawaateyaa+VII+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Sg: agawaateyaa
     agawaateyaa+VII+Cnj+Pos+Neu+0Sg: agawaateyaag
     agawaateyaa+VII+?+Pos+Neu+0Sg: egawaateyaag
     agawaateyaa+VII+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Sg+?: agawaateyaamagad
     agaasadegamaa+VII+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Sg: agaasadegamaa
     agaasadekamigaa+VII+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Sg: agaasadekamigaa
     agaasadekamigaa+VII+Cnj+Pos+Neu+0Sg: agaasadekamigaag
     agaasadesagaa+VII+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Sg: agaasadesagaa
     agaasadesagaa+VII+Cnj+Pos+Neu+0Sg: agaasadesagaag
     agaasadesagaa+VII+?+Pos+Neu+0Sg: egaasadesagaag
     agaasadetigweyaa+VII+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Sg: agaasadetigweyaa
     agaasadetigweyaa+VII+Cnj+Pos+Neu+0Sg: agaasadetigweyaag
     agaasadetigweyaa+VII+?+Pos+Neu+0Sg: egaasadetigweyaag
     agaasadetigweyaa+VII+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Sg: agaasadetigweyaamagad
     agaasadeyaa+VII+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Sg: agaasadeyaa
     agaasadeyaa+VII+Cnj+Pos+Neu+0Sg: agaasadeyaag
     agaasadeyaa+VII+?+Pos+Neu+0Sg: egaasadeyaag
     agaasadeyaa+VII+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Sg+?: agaasadeyaamagad
     agaasadinaa+VII+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Sg: agaasadinaa
     agaasadinaa+VII+Cnj+Pos+Neu+0Sg: agaasadinaag
     agaasadinaa+VII+?+Pos+Neu+0Sg: egaasadinaag
     agaasadinaa+VII+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Sg+?: agaasadinaamagad
     agaasashkiigaa+VII+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Sg: agaasashkiigaa
     agaasashkiigaa+VII+Cnj+Pos+Neu+0Sg: agaasashkiigaag
     agaasaa+VII+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Sg: agaasaa
     agaasaa+VII+Cnj+Pos+Neu+0Sg: agaasaag
     agaasaa+VII+?+Pos+Neu+0Sg: egaasaag
     agaasaa+VII+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Sg: agaasaamagad
     agaasibagaa+VII+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Sg: agaasibagaa
     agaasigamaa+VII+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Sg: agaasigamaa
     agaasigamaa+VII+Cnj+Pos+Neu+0Sg: agaasigamaag
     agaasigamaa+VII+?+Pos+Neu+0Sg: egaasigamaag
     agwanaabikaa+VII+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Sg: agwanaabikaa
     agwanaabikaa+VII+Cnj+Pos+Neu+0Sg: agwanaabikaag
     agwaayaashkaa+VII+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Sg: agwaayaashkaa
     agwaayaashkaa+VII+Cnj+Pos+Neu+0Sg: agwaayaashkaag
     akakanzhekaa+VII+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Sg: akakanzhekaa 
     akakanzhekaa+VII+Cnj+Pos+Neu+0Sg: akakanzhekaag
     akakanzhekaa+VII+?+Pos+Neu+0Sg: ekakanzhekaag
     akakanzhekaa+VII+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Sg+?: akakanzhekaamagad
     akiikaa+VII+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Sg: akiikaa
     akiikaa+VII+Cnj+Pos+Neu+0Sg: akiikaag
     akiikaa+VII+?+Pos+Neu+0Sg: ekiikaag
     akobii+VII+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Sg: akobii
     akobii+VII+Cnj+Pos+Neu+0Sg: akobiig
     akobii+VII+?+Pos+Neu+0Sg: ekobiig
     akobii+VII+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Sg: akobiimagad
     akogamaa+VII+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Sg: akogamaa
     akogamaa+VII+Cnj+Pos+Neu+0Sg: akogamaag
     akogamaa+VII+?+Pos+Neu+0Sg: ekogamaag
     akoosagaa+VII+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Sg: akoosagaa
     akoosagaa+VII+Cnj+Pos+Neu+0Sg: akoosagaag
     akoosagaa+VII+?+Pos+Neu+0Sg: ekoosagaag
     akwadaawangaa+VII+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Sg: akwadaawangaa
     akwadaawangaa+VII+Cnj+Pos+Neu+0Sg: akwadaawangaag
     akwadaawangaa+VII+?+Pos+Neu+0Sg: ekwadaawangaag
     akwaa+VII+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Sg: akwaa
     akwaa+VII+Cnj+Pos+Neu+0Sg: akwaag
     akwaa+VII+?+Pos+Neu+0Sg: ekwaag
     akwaa+VII+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Sg+?: akwaamagad
     akwaakwaa+VII+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Sg: akwaakwaa
     akwaakwaa+VII+Cnj+Pos+Neu+0Sg: akwaakwaag
     akwaakwaa+VII+?+Pos+Neu+0Sg: ekwaakwaag
     akwaakwaa+VII+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Sg+?: akwaakwaamagad
     akwiindimaa+VII+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Sg: akwiindimaa 
     akwiindimaa+VII+Cnj+Pos+Neu+0Sg: akwiindimaag
     akwiindimaa+VII+?+Pos+Neu+0Sg: ekwiindimaag
     akwiindimaa+VII+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Sg+?: akwiindimaamagad
     amikokaa+VII+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Sg: amikokaa
     amikokaa+VII+Cnj+Pos+Neu+0Sg: amikokaag
     anangokaa+VII+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Sg: anangokaa
     anangokaa+VII+Cnj+Pos+Neu+0Sg: anangokaag
     anangokaa+VII+?+Pos+Neu+0Sg: enangokaag
     anibekamigaa+VII+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Sg: anibekamigaa
     anibekamigaa+VII+Cnj+Pos+Neu+0Sg: anibekamigaag
     animaashkaa+VII+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Sg: animaashkaa
     animaashkaa+VII+Cnj+Pos+Neu+0Sg: animaashkaag
     animaashkaa+VII+?+Pos+Neu+0Sg: enimaashkaag
     animibiisaa+VII+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Sg: animibiisaa 
     animibiisaa+VII+Cnj+Pos+Neu+0Sg: animibiisaag
     animibiisaa+VII+?+Pos+Neu+0Sg: enimibiisaag
     animibiisaa+VII+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Sg: animibiisaamagad
     animikiikaa+VII+Imp+Pos+Neu+0Sg: animikiikaa
     animikiikaa+VII+Cnj+Pos+Neu+0Sg: animikiikaag
     animikiikaa+VII+?+Pos+Neu+0Sg: enimikiikaag
     animwewebiisaa+VII+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Sg: animwewebiisaa
     animwewebiisaa+VII+Cnj+Pos+Neu+0Sg: animwewebiisaag
     animwewebiisaa+VII+?+Pos+Neu+0Sg: enimwewebiisaag
     animwewebiisaa+VII+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Sg: animwewebiisaamagad
     aninaatigokaa+VII+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Sg: aninaatigokaa
     aninaatigokaa+VII+Cnj+Pos+Neu+0Sg: aninaatigokaag
     anishinaabekaa+VII+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Sg: anishinaabekaa
     anishinaabekaa+VII+Cnj+Pos+Neu+0Sg: anishinaabekaag
     anishinaabekaa+VII+?+Pos+Neu+0Sg: enishinaabekaag
     anitekamigaa+VII+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Sg: anitekamigaa
     anitekamigaa+VII+Cnj+Pos+Neu+0Sg: anitekamigaag
     aniibiminikaa+VII+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Sg: aniibiminikaa
     aniibiminikaa+VII+Cnj+Pos+Neu+0Sg: aniibiminikaag
     aniibiishensikaa+VII+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Sg: aniibiishensikaa
     aniibiishensikaa+VII+Cnj+Pos+Neu+0Sg: aniibiishensikaag
     aniibiishensikaa+VII+?+Pos+Neu+0Sg: eniibiishensikaag
     aniibiishi-ozhaawishkwaa+VII+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Sg: aniibiishi-ozhaawishkwaa
     aniibiishi-ozhaawishkwaa+VII+Cnj+Pos+Neu+0Sg: aniibiishi-ozhaawishkwaag
     aniibiishi-ozhaawishkwaa+VII+?+Pos+Neu+0Sg: eniibiishi-ozhaawishkwaag
     aniibiishikaa+VII+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Sg: aniibiishikaa
     aniibiishikaa+VII+Cnj+Pos+Neu+0Sg: aniibiishikaag
     aniibiishikaa+VII+?+Pos+Neu+0Sg: eniibiishikaag
     aniibiishikaa+VII+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Sg+?: aniibiishikaamagad
     anokiiwinikaa+VII+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Sg: anokiiwinikaa
     anokiiwinikaa+VII+Cnj+Pos+Neu+0Sg: anokiiwinikaag
     anokiiwinikaa+VII+?+Pos+Neu+0Sg: enokiiwinikaag
     apagadaashkaa+VII+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Sg: apagadaashkaa
     apagadaashkaa+VII+Cnj+Pos+Neu+0Sg: apagadaashkaag
     apagadaashkaa+VII+?+Pos+Neu+0Sg: epagadaashkaag
     apiichaa+VII+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Sg: apiichaa 
     apiichaa+VII+Cnj+Pos+Neu+0Sg: apiichaag
     apiichaa+VII+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Sg+?: apiichaamagad
     apiichaa+VII+?+Pos+Neu+0Sg: epiichaag
     apiichibiiyaa+VII+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Sg: apiichibiiyaa
     apiichibiiyaa+VII+Cnj+Pos+Neu+0Sg: apiichibiiyaag
     apiichibiiyaa+VII+?+Pos+Neu+0Sg: epiichibiiyaag
     apiichigaa+VII+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Sg: apiichigaa
     apiichigaa+VII+Cnj+Pos+Neu+0Sg: apiichigaag
     apiichigaa+VII+?+Pos+Neu+0Sg: epiichigaag
     apiitadeyaa+VII+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Sg: apiitadeyaa
     apiitadeyaa+VII+Cnj+Pos+Neu+0Sg: apiitadeyaag
     apiitadeyaa+VII+?+Pos+Neu+0Sg: epiitadeyaag
     apiitaa+VII+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Sg: apiitaa
     apiitaa+VII+Cnj+Pos+Neu+0Sg: apiitaag
     apiitaa+VII+?+Pos+Neu+0Sg: epiitaag
     apiitaa+VII+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Sg+?: apiitaamagad
     apiitaagamishkaa+VII+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Sg: apiitaagamishkaa
     apiitaagamishkaa+VII+Cnj+Pos+Neu+0Sg: apiitaagamishkaag
     apiitaagamishkaa+VII+?+Pos+Neu+0Sg: epiitaagamishkaag
     apiitaagonagaa+VII+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Sg: apiitaagonagaa
     apiitaagonagaa+VII+Cnj+Pos+Neu+0Sg: apiitaagonagaag
     apiitaagonagaa+VII+?+Pos+Neu+0Sg: epiitaagonagaag
     asabaa+VII+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Sg: asabaa
     asabaa+VII+Cnj+Pos+Neu+0Sg: asabaag
     asabaa+VII+?+Pos+Neu+0Sg: esabaag
     asabishkaa+VII+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Sg: asabishkaa
     asabishkaa+VII+Cnj+Pos+Neu+0Sg: asabishkaag
     asabishkaa+VII+?+Pos+Neu+0Sg: esabishkaag
     asiniikamigaa+VII+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Sg: asiniikamigaa
     asiniikamigaa+VII+Cnj+Pos+Neu+0Sg: asiniikamigaag
     asiniikaa+VII+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Sg: asiniikaa 
     asiniikaa+VII+Cnj+Pos+Neu+0Sg: asiniikaag
     asiniikaa+VII+?+Pos+Neu+0Sg: esiniikaag
     asiniikaa+VII+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Sg+?: asiniikaamagad
     asiniiwakamigaa+VII+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Sg: asiniiwakamigaa
     asiniiwakamigaa+VII+Cnj+Pos+Neu+0Sg: asiniiwakamigaag
     asiniiwaamikaa+VII+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Sg: asiniiwaamikaa
     asiniiwaamikaa+VII+Cnj+Pos+Neu+0Sg: asiniiwaamikaag
     ashawekamigaa+VII+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Sg: ashawekamigaa
     ashawekamigaa+VII+Cnj+Pos+Neu+0Sg: ashawekamigaag
     ashi-bezhigo-diba'iganeyaa+VII+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Sg: ashi-bezhigo-diba'iganeyaa
     ashi-bezhigo-diba'iganeyaa+VII+Cnj+Pos+Neu+0Sg: ashi-bezhigo-diba'iganeyaag
     ashiwaa+VII+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Sg: ashiwaa
     ashiwaa+VII+Cnj+Pos+Neu+0Sg: ashiwaag
     ashiwaa+VII+?+Pos+Neu+0Sg: eshiwaag
     ashiwaa+VII+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Sg+?: ashiwaamagad
     ashkibagaa+VII+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Sg: ashkibagaa
     ashkibagaa+VII+Cnj+Pos+Neu+0Sg: ashkibagaag
     ashkibagaa+VII+?+Pos+Neu+0Sg: eshkibagaag
     ashkibagaa+VII+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Sg+?: ashkibagaamagad
     ashkibagokaa+VII+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Sg: ashkibagokaa
     ashkibagokaa+VII+Cnj+Pos+Neu+0Sg: ashkibagokaag
     awanibiisaa+VII+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Sg: awanibiisaa
     awanibiisaa+VII+Cnj+Pos+Neu+0Sg: awanibiisaag
     awanibiisaa+VII+?+Pos+Neu+0Sg: ewanibiisaag
     awanibiisaa+VII+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Sg: awanibiisaamagad
     awibaa+VII+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Sg: awibaa
     awibaa+VII+Cnj+Pos+Neu+0Sg: awibaag
     awibaa+VII+?+Pos+Neu+0Sg: ewibaag
     awibaa+VII+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Sg+?: awibaamagad
     ayaa+VII+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Sg: ayaa 
     ayaa+VII+Cnj+Pos+Neu+0Sg: ayaag
     ayaa+VII+?+Pos+Neu+0Sg: eyaag
     ayaa+VII+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Sg+?: ayaamagad
     azhashkiikaa+VII+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Sg: azhashkiikaa
     azhashkiikaa+VII+Cnj+Pos+Neu+0Sg: azhashkiikaag
     azhashkiikaa+VII+?+Pos+Neu+0Sg: ezhashkiikaag
     azhashkiikaa+VII+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Sg+?: azhashkiikaamagad
     azhashkiiwakamigaa+VII+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Sg: azhashkiiwakamigaa
     azhashkiiwakamigaa+VII+Cnj+Pos+Neu+0Sg: azhashkiiwakamigaag
     azheshkaa+VII+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Sg: azheshkaa
     azheshkaa+VII+Cnj+Pos+Neu+0Sg: azheshkaag
     azheshkaa+VII+?+Pos+Neu+0Sg: ezheshkaag
     azheshkaa+VII+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Sg: azheshkaamagad
     azhiwaa+VII+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Sg: azhiwaa
     azhiwaa+VII+Cnj+Pos+Neu+0Sg: azhiwaag
     azhiwaa+VII+?+Pos+Neu+0Sg: ezhiwaag
     aabawaa+VII+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Sg: aabawaa
     aabawaa+VII+Cnj+Pos+Neu+0Sg: aabawaag
     aabawaa+VII+?+Pos+Neu+0Sg: ayaabawaag
     aabawaa+VII+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Sg+?: aabawaamagad
     aabijibiisaa+VII+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Sg: aabijibiisaa
     aabijibiisaa+VII+Cnj+Pos+Neu+0Sg: aabijibiisaag
     aabishkaa+VII+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Sg: aabishkaa
     aabishkaa+VII+Cnj+Pos+Neu+0Sg: aabishkaag
     aabitoobii+VII+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Sg: aabitoobii
     aabitoobii+VII+Cnj+Pos+Neu+0Sg: aabitoobiig
     aabitoobii+VII+?+Pos+Neu+0Sg: ayaabitoobiig
     aabitoobii+VII+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Sg+?: aabitoobiimagad
     aaboozikaa+VII+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Sg: aaboozikaa 
     aaboozikaa+VII+Cnj+Pos+Neu+0Sg: aaboozikaag
     aaboozikaa+VII+?+Pos+Neu+0Sg: ayaaboozikaag
     aaboozikaa+VII+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Sg: aaboozikaamagad
     aakoziwinikaa+VII+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Sg: aakoziwinikaa
     aakoziwinikaa+VII+Cnj+Pos+Neu+0Sg: aakoziwinikaag
     aakoziwinikaa+VII+?+Pos+Neu+0Sg: ayaakoziwinikaag
     aakoziwinikaa+VII+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Sg+?: aakoziwinikaamagad
     aamookaa+VII+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Sg: aamookaa
     aamookaa+VII+Cnj+Pos+Neu+0Sg: aamookaag
     aanakwadokaa+VII+Imp+Pos+Neu+0Sg: aanakwadokaa
     aanakwadokaa+VII+Cnj+Pos+Neu+0Sg: aanakwadokaag
     aandegokaa+VII+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Sg: aandegokaa
     aandegokaa+VII+Cnj+Pos+Neu+0Sg: aandegokaag
     aanikegamaa+VII+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Sg: aanikegamaa 
     aanikegamaa+VII+Cnj+Pos+Neu+0Sg: aanikegamaag
     aanikegamaa+VII+?+Pos+Neu+0Sg: ayaanikegamaag
     aanikegamaa+VII+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Sg+?: aanikegamaamagad
     aasamaakwaa+VII+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Sg: aasamaakwaa
     aasaakamigokamigaa+VII+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Sg: aasaakamigokamigaa
     aasaakamigokamigaa+VII+Cnj+Pos+Neu+0Sg: aasaakamigokamigaag
     aazhawakamigaa+VII+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Sg: aazhawakamigaa
     aazhawakamigaa+VII+Cnj+Pos+Neu+0Sg: aazhawakamigaag
